Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-302
Board of trustees; officers; body corporate; audit.

The members of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall annually elect a president and vice president from among their own number. The board shall constitute a body corporate to be known as the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, and as such may sue and be sued, and may make and use a common seal and alter the same at its pleasure. The board shall also select a secretary who shall keep an exact and detailed account of the activities of the board. The State Treasurer shall be treasurer of the board by virtue of the office. A complete and comprehensive annual audit shall be made of the books, accounts, funds, records, and affairs of the board and each of the state colleges.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 2, p. 373;

R.S.1913, § 7058;

C.S.1922, § 6693;

C.S.1929, § 85-302;

Laws 1943, c. 229, § 1, p. 776;

R.S.1943, § 85-302;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 3, p. 3200;

Laws 1969, c. 845, § 2, p. 3184;

Laws 1973, LB 130, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 21;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 2.